Louisiana, session 2026, HB766.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:999.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§999.1. Parity for orally administered anti-cancer medications with intravenously
administered or injected anti-cancer medications
A. It is hereby declared that the public policy of this state is that every
person within this state with a health insurance coverage plan that provides coverage
for cancer treatment shall have access to the type of covered medication used to treat
his the insured's cancer, as such a decision affects the person's overall, long-term
health and quality of life. It is also declared that orally administered anti-cancer
medications, although very effective in killing or slowing the growth of cancerous
cells, have high out-of-pocket costs to the covered person, impacting the decision of
physicians to prescribe such medications, thus restricting patient access to life-saving
oral anti-cancer medications. It is further declared that physicians must be able to
make the best choice for their patients, considering the unique aspects of each patient
and the progress of the disease.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 766 ENROLLED
B.(1) A health insurance issuer that provides coverage for cancer treatment
shall provide for coverage of for prescribed orally administered anti-cancer
medications on a basis no less favorable than intravenously administered or injected
anti-cancer medications, as provided in this Section.
(2) Health insurance coverage of orally administered anti-cancer medications
shall not be subject to any prior authorization, dollar limit, copayment, deductible,
or other out-of-pocket expense that does not apply to intravenously administered or
injected cancer medications, regardless of formulation or benefit category
determination by the health insurance issuer. A health coverage plan shall not
impose any prior authorization, dollar limit, copayment, deductible, coinsurance,
specialty tier placement, formulary classification, benefit category determination, or
other cost-sharing or utilization management requirement on orally administered
anti-cancer medications that results in greater out-of-pocket expense or more
restrictive access than that imposed on intravenously administered or injected anti-
cancer medications by the health insurance issuer.
(3) Cost-sharing for orally administered anti-cancer medications shall be
applied toward the enrollee's deductible and annual out-of-pocket maximum in the
same manner as other covered benefits under the health coverage plan.
(4) A health insurance issuer shall not reclassify or increase any type of cost-
sharing to the covered person for anti-cancer medications in order to achieve
compliance with this Section. Any change in health insurance coverage that
otherwise increases an out-of-pocket expense applied to anti-cancer medications
shall also be applied to the majority of comparable medical or pharmaceutical
benefits covered by the health insurance issuer.
(4) (5) A health insurance issuer that limits the total amount paid by a
covered person through all cost-sharing requirements to no more than one hundred
eighty dollars per filled prescription for any orally administered anti-cancer
medication shall be considered in compliance with this Section. For purposes of this
Paragraph,"cost-sharing requirements" shall include copayments, coinsurance,
deductibles, and any other amounts paid by the covered person for that prescription.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 766 ENROLLED
(6) A health insurance issuer shall not implement or utilize a copayment
adjustment program, including but not limited to an accumulator adjustment
program, maximizer program, or similar benefit design that adjusts, reduces,
excludes, or otherwise fails to credit the value of any manufacturer-sponsored or
third-party payment, discount, voucher, coupon, or financial assistance toward an
enrollee's deductible, cost-sharing obligation, or annual out-of-pocket maximum
under the health coverage plan for anti-cancer medications as part of high-deductible
health plan policies that are eligible for use in conjunction with health savings
accounts (HSAs), medical savings accounts (MSAs), or other similar programs
authorized under 26 U.S.C. 220 et seq.
C. As used in this Section:
(1) "Anti-cancer medications" means medications used to kill or slow the
growth of cancer cells, including orally administered, self-administered, injected, or
intravenously administered medications approved for the treatment of cancer.
(2) "Covered person" means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee, or other
individual enrolled in or insured by a health insurance issuer for a health insurance
coverage plan.
(3) "Health insurance coverage plan" or "coverage" means benefits
consisting of medical care provided or arranged for directly, through insurance or
reimbursement, or through a network, and including services paid for as medical care
under any hospital or medical service policy or certificate, hospital or medical
service plan contract, preferred provider organization agreement, or health
maintenance organization contract offered by a health insurance issuer, including
individual and group policies and plans.
(4) "Health insurance issuer" means any entity that offers a health insurance
coverage plan through a policy or certificate of insurance subject to state law that
regulates the business of insurance. For purposes of this Section, a "health insurance
issuer" shall include a health maintenance organization, as defined and licensed
pursuant to Subpart I of Part I of Chapter 2 of this Title, nonfederal government
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 766 ENROLLED
plans subject to the provisions of Subpart B of this Part, and the Office of Group
Benefits.
(5) "Network of providers" or "network" means an entity other than a health
insurance issuer that, through contracts with health care providers, provides or
arranges for access by groups of covered persons to covered health care services by
health care providers who are not otherwise or individually contracted directly with
a health insurance issuer.
(6) "Copayment adjustment program" means a benefit design, practice, or
program implemented by a health insurance issuer or pharmacy benefit manager that
adjusts, reduces, excludes, or otherwise fails to credit the value of any manufacturer-
sponsored or third-party payment, discount, voucher, coupon, or financial assistance
toward an enrollee's deductible, cost-sharing obligation, or annual out-of-pocket
maximum under the health coverage plan.
(7) "Specialty tier" means a formulary tier within a health coverage plan that
imposes a coinsurance percentage or other cost-sharing requirement that exceeds the
lowest applicable cost-sharing tier for prescription drugs under the health coverage
plan.
D. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to the following:
(1) Limited benefit health insurance policies or contracts.
(2) High deductible health plans or policies that are qualified to be used in
conjunction with a health savings account, a medical savings account, or other
similar program authorized by 26 U.S.C. 220 et seq.
(3) Qualified health plans offered through a health benefit exchange.
(1) This Section shall apply to individual and group health coverage plans,
high-deductible health plans, qualified health plans offered through a health benefit
exchange, nonfederal governmental plans, and the Office of Group Benefits, to the
maximum extent permitted under federal law.
(2) The provisions of this Section do not apply to limited benefit health
insurance policies or contracts.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 766 ENROLLED
(3) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to regulate self-funded
employee benefit plans governed by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act
of 1974 (ERISA), except to the extent permitted under federal law.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.